Utah statutes.
53B-17-504.   Powers of university as related to research park.
The University of Utah has the following powers:
(1)  to establish, acquire, develop, maintain, and operate a research park,
including the acquisition of all necessary or suitable buildings, facilities,
and improvements, and to acquire, purchase, construct, reconstruct, improve,
remodel, add to, extend, maintain, equip, and furnish the research park or any
building or facility, including research and service facilities and areas
intended for the common use of the research park tenants;
(2)  to form nonprofit corporations or foundations to aid and assist the
University of Utah to attain its charitable, scientific, literary, and
educational objectives, including the acquisition, construction, financing,
operation, and management of a research park;
(3)  to lease to the nonprofit corporation or foundation all or part of the
land and facilities included in the research park upon terms and conditions
established by the University of Utah, and to enter into any other contract or
agreement with the nonprofit corporation or foundation as necessary for the
construction, financing, operation, and management of the research park;
(4)  to lease, either directly or through a nonprofit corporation or
foundation, to any person, firm, partnership, or corporation engaged in
business for a profit any part or all of the land, buildings, or facilities of
the research park under guidelines established by the university;
(5)  to allow a lessee to acquire or construct necessary or suitable
buildings, facilities, and improvements upon the leased property. Any
improvements acquired or constructed upon the premises during the term of the
lease reverts to and becomes the property of the university at the termination
of the lease, its renewal, or extension; and
(6)  to finance all or part of the cost of the research park including the
purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, remodeling, addition to,
extension, maintenance, equipment, and furnishing as permitted by law for the
financing of self-liquidating projects by institutions of higher education.
